Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 15 Deer Hunting

20-15-1.
Deer hunting prohibited except as provided.

No person shall hunt, pursue, or shoot, or attempt to hunt, pursue, or shoot, deer in this state except as provided in this chapter. Deer hunting shall be limited to seasons, times, manner of taking, and bag limits established in regulations adopted by the director pursuant to §

20-1-12

. The regulations shall be formulated to include the best methods to provide for the safety both of hunters and residents. In any event, the following prohibitions and restrictions shall always apply to deer hunting:

No firearm deer hunting shall be done within five hundred feet (500´) of any building or dwelling house in use without the specific written permission of the owner or tenant of the dwelling.

No archery deer hunting shall be done within two hundred feet (200´) of any building or dwelling house in use without the specific written permission of the owner or tenant of the dwelling unless otherwise established in regulations adopted by the director, or his or her designee, for the purpose of wildlife management;

Hunting shall only be permitted from one half (1/2) hour before sunrise to one half (1/2) hour after sunset;

No dog shall be employed in any deer-hunting activities;

No hunting shall be done on any privately owned land without the written permission of the owner of the land;

Only a shotgun, muzzle-loading rifle, or long bow (straight limb, reflex, recurve, and compound bow) or crossbow and arrow shall be utilized in deer hunting;

No person shall make, set, or use any trap or snare or salt lick or other device for the purpose of ensnaring, enticing, taking, injuring, or killing a deer;

No person shall individually, or in conjunction with others, use an artificial light at any time to illuminate, jacklight, locate, attempt to locate, or show up wild birds or mammals, or any other vertebrates, when that person, or persons, have in their actual possession, in the passenger compartment of their vehicle, or in the storage area of a truck or van, unless locked in a case, a crossbow, long bow (straight limb, reflex, recurve, and compound bow) rifle, gun, or pistol; and

Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this section or the rules and regulations promulgated under this section and §

20-1-12

, in addition to the penalties provided by §

20-1-16

, any weapons, guns, lights, or other equipment used in killing or attempting to kill any deer shall be forfeited to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 107, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 417, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 137, § 1.

20-15-2.
Deer permits.

No person shall hunt deer within this state unless that person possesses a deer tag. Any resident or nonresident holder of a hunting license or combination license may obtain a shotgun, muzzle-loading rifle, or crossbow, or archery deer tag from the director. The deer permit shall be carried at all times by the person to whom it is issued while hunting for deer. Any person who takes a deer in this state shall immediately affix his or her tag portion of his or her deer permit to the carcass of the taken deer, and, within twenty-four (24) hours of the taking, convey the deer to an environmental police officer or other designee of the department, or to a deer-check station, if one is in operation at the time, for checking. Any dead deer found not having a tag attached to it identifying the owner shall be the property of the state and shall be seized by any environmental police officer who finds or locates the carcass, to be disposed of by direction of the director.

Crossbow permits. Crossbow permits may be issued by the department to those persons who have a permanent physical impairment due to injury or disease, congenital or acquired, that renders them so severely disabled as to be unable to use a conventional bow and arrow device. Said permits will be issued by the department only after the receipt of a physician’s statement confirming the applicant is impaired as referred to above. All permittees must have taken and successfully completed both hunter education and bow hunter education classes prior to the issuance of a permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 417, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 137, § 1.

20-15-3.
Permit to landowner to protect property.

Any person owning or occupying any property, and any employee of that person, while on that person’s premises, may kill any deer found destroying any crops, vegetables, or fruit trees, or otherwise causing damage to that property; provided, however, that this person shall not kill any deer unless he or she has obtained a permit from the director to do so. The director, on application, may issue the permit to any responsible owner, or the owner’s employee, provided that no such permit shall be issued until the director has determined that actual damage has been done to crops, vegetables, fruit trees, or other property by any deer, and that no practical alternative to the shooting of the deer is available. This permit shall be issued on an annual basis at a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Any person taking or wounding a deer under the permit shall report the taking or wounding to a conservation officer or other designee of the director within twenty-four (24) hours of the taking or wounding.

Hunting shall only be permitted from one half (1/2) hour before sunrise to one half (1/2) hour after sunset; provided that the director, subject to terms and conditions to be set forth by regulation, may authorize hunting at other times on farmlands; and further provided, that these farms have experienced severe deer damage to a cash crop or crops, and have attempted unsuccessfully other reasonable means of controlling the damage, including daylight hunting; and provided further, that the director determines whether these farmlands are of sufficient size to support night hunting without endangering the public safety. A night hunting permit may be issued by the director to any responsible owner, or the owner’s employee, provided that no such permit shall be issued until the director has determined that actual damage has been done to crops, vegetables, fruit trees, or other property by any deer, and that no practical alternative to the shooting of the deer is available. This permit shall be issued on an annual basis at a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Under the authority of the director, the division of agriculture shall be responsible for administering the provisions of this section as they relate to farmers, and may also be responsible for administering this section as it relates to other landowners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 5.

20-15-4.
Equipment used by archers.

No person hunting, pursuing or taking deer by archery shall be equipped with equipment not authorized by regulations promulgated by the department and/or as authorized by subsection (b).

Possession of archery aid devices for deer hunting with special permit. Any person who has a permanent physical impairment due to injury or disease, congenital or acquired, that renders them so severely disabled as to be unable to use a conventional bow and arrow device, and/or who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older, may legally hunt deer using adaptive equipment and aids. Said permits will be issued by the department only after the receipt of a physician’s statement confirming the applicant is impaired as referred to above.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 137, § 1.

20-15-5.
Possession of unlawful weapons while hunting.

No person shall use, or have in his or her possession, while hunting for deer, pistols, guns, or other firearms, spear guns, crossbows, explosive points, poisonous or barbed points, or any other projectile, propelled by any means, capable of carrying or injecting any incapacitating drug or chemical; provided, however, that a duly licensed person may hunt for deer by shotgun, muzzle-loading rifle, long bow (straight limb, reflex, recurve, or compound bow) or crossbow. Possession of any deer showing evidence that it was taken with a prohibited device shall be a violation of this section. Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this section, any weapons, guns, or ammunition shall be forfeited to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 417, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 137, § 1.

20-15-6.
Prohibition of hunting by local authorities.

Any city or town council is authorized and empowered to prohibit hunting, possessing, or taking deer within the boundaries of the city or town by ordinance duly enacted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-15-7.
Deer colliding with vehicles.

The owner of any vehicle that has been substantially damaged by collision with a deer shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after the collision, report the accident to a conservation officer. The officer shall investigate, and if he or she finds the damage has been done as alleged, the officer shall give a certificate to the person entitling the person to ownership of the deer carcass to be possessed and consumed only with the immediate family of the owner of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-15-8.
Report of killing or wounding.

Any person who wounds or kills a deer shall make a written report stating the facts relative to the wounding or killing, signed by him or her, to be sent or submitted within twenty-four (24) hours to the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-15-9.
Unlawful possession or sale of deer.

It shall be unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession any deer, or part of a deer, unless the deer has been taken legally under the provisions of this chapter, or has been imported legally from another state or country. It is unlawful for any person, at any time, to sell, or offer for sale, any deer, or part of a deer, excepting non-edible parts such as heads, hides, or skins, except as provided elsewhere in this title. Possession of each deer, or part of a deer, in violation of this section is considered a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.